Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3511
Licensed surgical first assistant; activities authorized.

A licensed surgical first assistant may engage in the practice of surgical assisting, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Assisting in the intraoperative care of a surgical patient;

(2) Positioning the patient;

(3) Preparing and draping the patient for the surgical procedure;

(4) Providing visualization of the operative site;

(5) Assisting with hemostasis;

(6) Assisting with closure of body planes, including the following:

(a) Inserting running or interrupted subcutaneous sutures with absorbable or nonabsorbable material;

(b) Utilizing subcuticular closure technique with or without adhesive skin closure strips; and

(c) Closing skin with method indicated by surgeon, including, but not limited to, suture and staples;

(7) Applying appropriate wound dressings;

(8) Providing assistance in securing drainage systems to tissue;

(9) Preparing specimens, such as grafts; and

(10) Performing other tasks during a surgical procedure delegated by and under the personal supervision of a physician appropriate to the level of competence of the surgical first assistant.

Laws 2016, LB721, § 11.